Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 8
AREA TECHNICAL COLLEGES

23-60-801. Area vocational schools - name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 929, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 148, § 28, effective August 10.

23-60-802. Area technical colleges - credits - transfer.

On or before September 1, 2004, the board shall adopt policies to ensure that, if a student completes a program of study at an area technical college and subsequently enrolls in an institution within the state system of community and technical colleges, or transfers from an area technical college to an institution within the state system of community and technical colleges, any postsecondary course credits earned by the student while enrolled in the area technical college will apply in full at another area technical college or to an appropriate program leading to a certificate or to an associate degree at a community or technical college. Postsecondary credits earned by a student at an area technical college may be transferred into an associate degree program at a community college or into a degree program at a four-year institution of higher education as provided in section 23-1-108 (7) and the state credit transfer policies established by the Colorado commission on higher education.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire part added, p. 930, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1082), ch. 58, p. 149, § 29, effective August 10.